zh-CN: 护膝设计: 双层护膝; 单层护膝; 三层护膝; 其他
pt-PT: Design da proteção para os joelhos: Joelho duplo; Joelho simples; Joelho triplo; Outro
fr: Structure de la protection de genou: Double genou; Genou simple; Triple genou; Autre
it: Protezione per il ginocchio: Ginocchio doppio; Ginocchio singolo; Ginocchio triplo; Altro
zh-TW: 護膝設計: 雙層膝蓋; 單層膝蓋; 三層膝蓋; 其他
pl: Konstrukcja ochrony kolan: Podwójne kolano; Pojedyncze kolano; Potrójne kolano; Inny
ro-RO: Designul genunchierei: Genunchi dublu; Genunchi simplu; Genunchi triplu; Altele
bg-BG: Дизайн на защитата на коляното: Двойно коляно; Единично коляно; Тройно коляно; Друго
en: Knee protection design: Double knee; Single knee; Triple knee; Other
sl-SI: Zasnova zaščite za kolena: Dvojno koleno; Enojno koleno; Trojno koleno; Drugo
fi: Polvisuojan rakenne: Kaksinkertainen polvivahvike; Yksinkertainen polvivahvike; Kolminkertainen polvivahvike; Muu
de: Design des Knieschutzes: Doppelknie; Einfachknie; Dreifachknie; Sonstige
es: Diseño de rodillera: Rodilla doble; Rodilla simple; Rodilla triple; Otro
th: การออกแบบเพื่อป้องกันหัวเข่า: เสริมเข่าคู่; เสริมเข่าเดี่ยว; เสริมเข่าสามชั้น; อื่นๆ
nb: Knebeskyttelsesdesign: Dobbel knebeskyttelse; Enkel knebeskyttelse; Trippel knebeskyttelse; Annet
ru: Конструкция защиты колена: Двойное колено; Одинарное колено; Тройное колено; Другое
cs: Konstrukce chrániče kolen: Dvojitá kolena; Jednoduchá kolena; Trojitá kolena; Jiné
vi: Thiết kế bảo vệ đầu gối: Gối kép; Gối đơn; Gối ba; Khác
da: Knæbeskyttelsesdesign: Dobbelt knæ; Enkelt knæ; Tredobbelt knæ; Andet
pt-BR: Design da proteção para joelhos: Joelho duplo; Joelho simples; Joelho triplo; Outro
ja: 膝保護設計: ダブルニー; シングルニー; トリプルニー; その他
hr-HR: Dizajn zaštite za koljena: Dvostruko koljeno; Jednostruko koljeno; Trostruko koljeno; Ostalo
lt-LT: Kelio apsaugos dizainas: Dviguba kelių apsauga; Vienguba kelių apsauga; Triguba kelių apsauga; Kita
hu: Térdvédelmi kialakítás: Dupla térdvédő; Szimpla térdvédő; Tripla térdvédő; Egyéb
tr: Diz koruma tasarımı: Çift diz; Tek diz; Üçlü diz; Diğer
el: Αριθμός αρθρώσεων προστατευτικού γονάτου: Διπλό γόνατο; Μονό γόνατο; Τριπλό γόνατο; Άλλο
ko: 무릎 보호대 디자인: 더블 니; 싱글 니; 트리플 니; 기타
nl: Kniebescherming ontwerp: Dubbele knie; Enkele knie; Drievoudige knie; Anders
sk-SK: Dizajn chráničov kolien: Dvojité kolená; Jednoduché kolená; Trojité kolená; Iné
sv: Knäskyddsdesign: Dubbelt knä; Enkelt knä; Tredubbelt knä; Övrigt